Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6072XS (3) 91 je/js S.F. 2272 Section 1. Section 10A.202, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The department is responsible for the administration of 3 the laws of this state under chapters 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 90A , 4 91A , 91C , 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and such other labor-services 5 duties assigned to the department or director. 6 Sec. 2. Section 10A.204, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 3. The director, in consultation with the labor 9 commissioner, shall, at the time provided by law, make an 10 annual report to the governor setting forth in appropriate 11 form the business and expense of the division and department 12 under this subchapter for the preceding year, the number 13 of remedial actions taken under chapter 89A , the number of 14 disputes or violations processed by the division or department 15 and the disposition of the disputes or violations, and other 16 matters pertaining to the division or department under this 17 subchapter which that are of public interest, together with 18 recommendations for change or amendment of the laws in this 19 chapter and chapters 88 , 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 89B , 90A , 91A , 91C , 20 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and sections 85.67A and 85.68 , and the 21 recommendations, if any, shall be transmitted by the governor 22 to the first general assembly in session after the report is 23 filed. 24 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 91F.1 Definitions. 25 For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise 26 requires: 27 1. âDepartmentâ means the Iowa department of veterans 28 affairs established in section 35A.4. 29 2. âDirectorâ means the director of the department of 30 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 31 3. âEmployerâ means a person, as defined in section 4.1, 32 who in this state employs for wages fifty or more full-time 33 employees. 34 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 91F.2 Posting of veteransâ benefits 35 -1- LSB 6072XS (3) 91 je/js 1/ 2 S.F. 2272 and services. 1 1. The director shall consult with the department to create 2 a veteransâ benefits and services poster for employers to 3 display in the workplace. The director, in coordination with 4 the department, shall make the poster available to employers. 5 2. The poster shall include, at a minimum, information 6 regarding all of the following matters available to veterans: 7 a. Substance abuse and mental health treatment resources. 8 b. Educational, workforce, and training resources. 9 c. Tax benefits. 10 d. Vehicle registration, driverâs license, and nonoperatorâs 11 identification card services. 12 e. Eligibility for unemployment insurance benefits. 13 f. Legal services. 14 3. Every employer shall display the poster created pursuant 15 to this section in a conspicuous place accessible to employees 16 in the workplace. 17